Utah statutes.
63G-6-904 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Compliance by one public procurement unit pursuant to agreement considered compliance by others to agreement.

Where the public procurement unit administering a cooperative purchase complies with the requirements of this chapter, any public procurement unit participating in such a purchase shall be considered to have complied with this chapter.  Public procurement units may not enter into a cooperative purchasing agreement for the purpose of circumventing this chapter.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

